src/fst/test/gt-dict-yamls/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_vyehi_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - vyehi: # ok
    vyehi+N+Sg+Nom:   vyehi
    vyehi+N+Sg+Gen:   vyeṿi
    vyehi+N+Sg+Acc:   vyeṿi
    vyehi+N+Sg+Ill:   vuáhán
    vyehi+N+Sg+Loc:   vyeṿist
    vyehi+N+Sg+Com:   vuovˊvijn
    vyehi+N+Sg+Abe:   vyeˊṿittáá
    vyehi+N+Ess:      vyehin
    vyehi+N+Par:      vyehid
    vyehi+N+Pl+Nom:   vyeṿih
    vyehi+N+Pl+Gen:  [vuoṿij, vuoˊṿij]
    vyehi+N+Pl+Acc:   vuoṿijd
    vyehi+N+Pl+Ill:   vuovˊvijd
    vyehi+N+Pl+Loc:   vuoṿijn
    vyehi+N+Pl+Com:   vuoˊṿijguin
    vyehi+N+Pl+Abe:   vuoˊṿijttáá
    
  Noun - njäähi: # ok  
    njäähi+N+Sg+Nom:   njäähi
    njäähi+N+Sg+Gen:   njääṿi
    njäähi+N+Sg+Ill:   njááhán
    njäähi+N+Sg+Loc:   njääṿist
    njäähi+N+Sg+Com:   njavvijn
    njäähi+N+Sg+Abe:   njäˊṿittáá
    njäähi+N+Ess:      njäähin
    njäähi+N+Par:      njäähid
    njäähi+N+Pl+Nom:   njääṿih
    njäähi+N+Pl+Gen:  [njaaṿij, njaˊṿij]
    njäähi+N+Pl+Acc:   njaaṿijd
    njäähi+N+Pl+Ill:   njavvijd
    njäähi+N+Pl+Loc:   njaaṿijn
    njäähi+N+Pl+Com:   njaˊṿijguin
    njäähi+N+Pl+Abe:   njaˊṿijttáá
